District of Columbia statutes.
50-1641.03

John A. Wilson Building bicycle parking requirements.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, the Council shall increase the number of public bicycle parking spaces at the John A. Wilson Building.

(b)

The total number of public bicycle parking spaces provided at the John A. Wilson Building shall be no less than 16; provided, that:

(1)

Design, purchase, and installation of the public bicycle parking spaces shall be done in coordination with the District Department of Transportation (“DDOT”) from funds either already allocated to DDOT in fiscal year 2008 or already allocated to the Council in fiscal year 2008 for the maintenance of the John A. Wilson Building;

(2)

The design of the bicycle parking spaces shall be consistent with the architectural style and beauty of the John A. Wilson Building; and

(3)

At least one bicycle parking space shall be located adjacent to the public entrance on Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W., if this is determined to be consistent with historic preservation guidelines and National Park Service regulations.

Feb. 2, 2008, D.C. Law 17-103, § 4, 54 DCR 12213
Section 11 of D.C. Law 17-103 provided that this section shall be subject to appropriation.